Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.040

Application—Fee.

Every applicant for a license to practice medicine and surgery shall pay a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

[ 2003 c 275 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 160; 1985 c 322 s 1. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 61; 1955 c 202 s 35; prior: 1941 c 166 s 1, part; 1913 c 82 s 1, part; 1909 c 192 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10010-1, part.]